New Jersey, session 221, S4698.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2023, c.107 (C.17B:27F-3.1) is amended to read as follows: 3.  a.  A carrier shall: (1) monitor all activities carried out on behalf of the carrier by a pharmacy benefits manager if the carrier contracts with a pharmacy benefits manager and is related to a carrier's prescription drug benefits; and (2) ensure that all requirements of this section are met. b.    A carrier that contracts with a pharmacy benefits manager to perform any activities related to the carrier's prescription drug benefits shall ensure that, under the contract, the pharmacy benefits manager acts as the carrier's agent in good faith and fair dealing in the performance of all of its contractual duties.  All funds received by the pharmacy benefits manager in relation to providing pharmacy benefits management services shall be used or distributed only pursuant to the pharmacy benefits manager's contract with the health benefits plan or carrier or applicable law; including any administrative fee or payment to the pharmacy benefits manager expressly provided for in the contract to compensate the pharmacy benefits manager for its services.  Any funds received by the pharmacy benefits manager through spread pricing shall be subject to this subsection. c. (1) A pharmacy benefits manager interacting with a covered person shall have the same duty to a covered person as the health benefits plan or carrier for whom it is performing pharmacy benefits management services, except that the pharmacy benefits manager shall also have a fiduciary duty to the financial interests of covered persons. (2) A pharmacy benefits manager shall have a duty of good faith and fair dealing with all parties, including but not limited to covered persons and pharmacies, with whom it interacts in the performance of pharmacy benefits management services. d.    A carrier or pharmacy benefits manager shall not require a covered person to make a payment at the point of sale for a covered prescription drug in an amount greater than the lesser of: (1) the applicable cost-sharing amount for the prescription drug; or (2) the amount a covered person would pay for the prescription medication if the covered person purchased the prescription medication without using a health benefits plan. e.     A carrier shall provide a reasonably adequate retail pharmacy network for the provision of prescription drugs for its covered persons. f.     For the purposes of this section, "health benefits plan" shall include the State Health Benefits Plan, the School Employees' Health Benefits Plan, the State Medicaid program established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.), or a self-insured health benefits plan governed by the provisions of the federal "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974," 29 U.S.C., ss.1001 et seq. (cf: P.L.2023, c.107, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect on the 180th day next following its enactment, and shall apply to all contracts and policies delivered, issued, executed, or renewed on or after that date.